Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.085

Unfair labor practice procedures—Powers and duties of commission.

(1) The commission is empowered and directed to prevent any unfair labor practice and to issue appropriate remedial orders. However, a complaint may not be processed for any unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing of the complaint with the commission or in Thurston county superior court. This power may not be affected or impaired by any means of adjustment, mediation, or conciliation in labor disputes that have been or may hereafter be established by law.

(2) Except as may be specifically limited by this chapter, if the commission or court determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair labor practice, the commission or court shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages.

(3) The commission may petition the Thurston county superior court for the enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

[ 2024 c 333 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.